Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201460-121.01
Minitruck, defined.

Minitruck means a foreign-manufactured import vehicle or domestic-manufactured
vehicle which (1) is powered by an internal combustion engine with a piston
or rotor displacement of one thousand five
hundred cubic centimeters or less, (2) is sixty-seven inches or
less in width, (3) has a dry weight of four thousand two hundred pounds or
less, (4) travels on four or more tires, (5) has a top speed of approximately
fifty-five miles per hour, (6) is equipped with a bed or compartment for hauling,
(7) has an enclosed passenger cab, (8) is equipped with headlights, taillights,
turnsignals, windshield wipers, a rearview mirror, and an occupant protection
system, and (9) has a four-speed, five-speed, or automatic transmission.

Laws 2010, LB650, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB898, § 1.